Massachusetts, session 194th, S652.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13 of chapter 92A½ of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 12, the word, “and”.
Said section 13 of said chapter 92A½ , as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
inserting in line 13 after “the Friends of Quabbin, Inc.” the following words:- “and the
Belchertown Snowmobile Association of Massachusetts snowmobile club.”
of 1